New York, session 2025-2026, A11230.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The transportation law is amended by adding a new section 2 14-o to read as follows: 3 § 14-o. Veteran parking. 1. For the purposes of this section, the 4 following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "airport" shall mean an area of land or water used or intended to 6 be used for the landing and taking off of aircraft, an appurtenant area 7 used or intended to be used for airport buildings or other airport 8 facilities or rights of way, and airport buildings and facilities 9 located in any of those areas. Such term shall include heliports; 10 (b) "commercial service airport" shall mean a public airport or a 11 public-use airport in the state that, as determined by the United States 12 secretary of transportation, has at least twenty-five hundred passenger 13 boardings each year and is receiving scheduled passenger aircraft 14 service; 15 (c) "general aviation airport" shall mean a public airport or a publ- 16 ic-use airport with passenger boardings in the state that, as determined 17 by the United States secretary of transportation, either: (i) does not 18 have scheduled service; or (ii) has scheduled service with less than 19 twenty-five hundred passenger boardings each year; 20 (d) "passenger boardings" shall mean revenue passenger boardings in 21 the prior calendar year on an aircraft in service in air commerce, as 22 the United States secretary of transportation determines, including 23 passengers who continue on an aircraft in international flight that 24 stops at an airport in the state for a nontraffic purpose; 25 (e) "public airport" means an airport used or intended to be used for 26 public purposes: (i) that is under the control of the state, a county, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13934-01-5 A. 11230 2 1 city, town, or village or a state or local authority; and (ii) of which 2 the area used or intended to be used for the landing, taking off, or 3 surface maneuvering of aircraft is publicly owned. Provided, however, 4 such term shall not include any airport operated by a bi-state authori- 5 ty; and 6 (f) "public-use airport" shall mean an airport available for use by 7 the general public without a requirement for the prior approval of the 8 owner or operator thereof except as may be required by federal law or 9 regulation. 10 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the operator of a 11 commercial service airport and the operator of a general aviation 12 airport shall allow free access and parking at such airport for all 13 veterans. Provision of a veteran identification card shall be suffi- 14 cient under this section to grant the holder of such identification card 15 free access and parking at such airport. 16 3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any airport oper- 17 ated by a bi-state authority. 18 § 2. Chapter 802 of the laws of 1947 relating to facilitating the 19 financing and effectuation of air terminals by the Port of New York 20 Authority is amended by adding a new section 4-c to read as follows: 21 § 4-c. Veteran parking. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 22 any airport maintained or operated by the Port Authority shall allow 23 free access and parking at such airport for all veterans. Provision of a 24 veteran identification card shall be sufficient under this section to 25 grant the holder of such identification card free access and parking at 26 such airport. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 28 ing the date on which it shall have become a law, provided, however, 29 section two of this act shall take effect upon the enactment into law by 30 the state of New Jersey of legislation having an identical effect with 31 this act but if the state of New Jersey shall have already enacted such 32 legislation, then this act shall take effect immediately. The chair- 33 person of the port authority shall notify the legislative bill drafting 34 commission upon the enactment into law of such legislation by both such 35 states in order that the commission may maintain an accurate and timely 36 effective data base of the official text of the laws of the state of New 37 York in furtherance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the 38 legislative law and section 70-b of the public officers law.